Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.33.146

Contingency fund—Withdrawals.

No money shall be withdrawn from the contingency fund except by transfer to the appropriate operating fund authorized by a resolution or ordinance of the council, adopted by a vote of the majority of the entire council, clearly stating the facts constituting the reason for the withdrawal or the emergency as the case may be, specifying the fund to which the withdrawn money shall be transferred.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.33.146.]